Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services from any monies not otherwise


appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for


the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of One Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or so much thereof as may be


necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services by law.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 1908 Page 1


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1908 CJD 3/31/2025 10:01:41 AM









































Req. No. 1908 Page 2